Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB826.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 151B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
No less than eighty-five percent (85%) of general fund moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the Office
of Adult Education shall be used for programs to fulfill the adult education mission and goals enumerated in KRS
151B.402, 151B.403, 151B.406, and 151B.408. The Office of Adult Education may utilize any remaining general
fund moneys for administrative operations.
Section 2. KRS 151B.403 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of Adult Education within the Department of Workforce Development in the Education and Labor
Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish programs aligned with the College and Career
Readiness Standards for Adult Education, or any other similar standards adopted by the federal Office of
Career, Technical, and Adult Education, which upon successful completion, shall result in the issuance of a
High School Equivalency Diploma.
(2) (a) At least one (1) program authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall include a test aligned with
the College and Career Readiness Standards for Adult Education, or any other standards adopted by the
federal Office of Career, Technical, and Adult Education, to serve as a qualifying test, which upon
passing, shall entitle students to receive a High School Equivalency Diploma.
(b) A qualifying test meeting the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall provide an option
for students to be administered a written or paper test in lieu of an electronic administration.
(3) For purposes of any public employment, a High School Equivalency Diploma shall be considered equal to a
high school diploma issued under the provisions of KRS 158.140.
(4) A High School Equivalency Diploma shall be issued without charge upon successfully completing a High
School Equivalency Diploma program. A fee may be assessed by the Office of Adult Education for the
issuance of a duplicate High School Equivalency Diploma and for issuance of a duplicate score report. All fees
collected for duplicate diplomas and score reports shall be used to support the adult education program.
(5) The Office of Adult Education is authorized to contract annually with an institution of higher education or
other appropriate agency or entity for scoring High School Equivalency Diploma program examinations.
(6) On June 29, 2017, any high school equivalency diploma or external diploma previously recognized or issued
by the Commonwealth shall be considered retroactively as a High School Equivalency Diploma.
(7) Upon issuance, a High School Equivalency Diploma shall not be invalidated by any subsequent changes in test
selection under this section.
Section 3. 2026 RS SB 4/VO, Section 15, is hereby repealed. The reviser of statutes shall not codify the
provisions of Section 15 of 2026 RS SB 4/VO, and they shall have no legal effect.
Section 4. 2026 RS SB 4/VO, Section 16, is amended to read as follows:
The [McConnell Center at the University of Louisville and the ]Center of American Civics at the University of
Kentucky shall develop materials and curricula for a degree program that meets the requirements of this section and
distribute the materials and curricula developed to each public institution of higher education in this state. The
curricula shall be for a course of instruction that is three (3) semester hours, or the equivalent, in American
government or American history that provides a comprehensive overview of the major events and turning points of
American history and government and, at a minimum, includes:
(1) An understanding of the United States Constitution in its entirety;
(2) An understanding of the Declaration of Independence in its entirety;
(3) An understanding of a minimum of five (5) essays from the Federalist Papers in their entirety as selected by
the course instructor;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) An understanding of the Emancipation Proclamation in its entirety;
(5) An understanding of the Gettysburg Address in its entirety; and
(6) Other documents foundational to the American Civil Rights movement.
Signed by Governor April 23, 2026.